Nevada, session 83, AB177.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 637B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 11, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. “Speech-language pathology assistant” means a
person licensed pursuant to section 9 of this act to engage in the
practice of speech-language pathology under the supervision of a
supervising speech-language pathologist.
Sec. 3. “Speech-language pathology provisional licensee”
means any person who holds a provisional license issued pursuant
to NRS 637B.201 to engage in the practice of speech-language
pathology while completing the clinical fellowship requirements
for obtaining a Certificate of Clinical Competence in Speech-
Language Pathology issued by the American Speech-Language-
Hearing Association.
Sec. 4. “Speech-language pathology student” means an
unlicensed student who engages in the practice of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
speech-language pathology under the supervision of a supervising
speech-language pathologist pursuant to section 10 of this act.
Sec. 5. “Supervising speech-language pathologist” means a
speech-language pathologist who supervises a speech-language
pathology assistant, speech-language pathology provisional
licensee or speech-language pathology student.
Sec. 6. “Supervision” means the provision of direction and
the evaluation of the tasks assigned by a supervising speech-
language pathologist to a speech-language pathology assistant,
speech-language pathology provisional licensee or speech-
language pathology student. The term includes, without limitation,
direct supervision, indirect supervision and telesupervision.
Sec. 7. “Telesupervision” means the real-time, distance
observation by a supervising speech-language pathologist of
services delivered by a speech-language pathology assistant,
speech-language pathology provisional licensee or speech-
language pathology student, with feedback or assistance provided
by the supervising speech-language pathologist as needed. The
term may include, without limitation, the utilization of technology
which allows a supervising speech-language pathologist to view
and communicate with the client and speech-language pathology
assistant, speech-language pathology provisional licensee or
speech-language pathology student in real time through virtual
telecommunication software, webcam, telephone or other similar
devices and services to provide immediate feedback.
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. 1. An applicant for a license to engage in the
practice of speech-language pathology as a speech-language
pathology assistant must hold:
(a) A bachelor’s degree or master’s degree in speech-language
pathology or communication sciences and disorders awarded by:
(1) An educational institution that is accredited by an
accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education; or
(2) A foreign school which is accredited by an accrediting
agency approved by the Board and which provides an educational
program that is substantially equivalent to the educational
program provided by an institution described in subparagraph (1);
or
(b) A current endorsement issued on or before September 30,
2026, by the Department of Education pursuant to NRS 391.019
and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto which allows a
person to teach pupils who have speech and language
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
impairments and actively engage in the practice of speech-
language pathology within the scope of that endorsement at the
school or school district where the applicant is employed.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations regarding speech-
language pathology assistants, including, without limitation:
(a) The licensing of speech-language pathology assistants;
(b) The educational and training requirements for speech-
language pathology assistants, in addition to the requirements
prescribed by subsection 1; and
(c) The practice of speech-language pathology by speech-
language pathology assistants.
Sec. 10. 1. A speech-language pathology assistant, speech-
language pathology provisional licensee or speech-language
pathology student may engage in the practice of speech-language
pathology only under the supervision of a supervising speech-
language pathologist and in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
2. A speech-language pathology student who engages in the
practice of speech-language pathology must be enrolled in a
program to obtain a bachelor’s degree or master’s degree in the
field of speech-language pathology or communication sciences
and disorders at an educational institution that is accredited by a
nationally recognized agency under the United States Department
of Education.
3. The Board shall adopt regulations regarding the
supervision of speech-language pathology assistants, speech-
language pathology provisional licensees and speech-language
pathology students.
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. NRS 637B.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.020 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 637B.025 to
637B.075, inclusive, and sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act have
the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 13. NRS 637B.044 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.044 “Hearing aid” : [means any:]
1. [Device] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
means:
(a) Any device worn by a person who suffers from impaired
hearing for the purpose of amplifying sound to improve hearing or
compensate for impaired hearing, including, without limitation, an
earmold; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(b) Any part, attachment or accessory for a device described in
paragraph (a).
2. [Part, attachment or accessory for such a device.] Does not
include an over-the-counter hearing aid, as defined in 21 C.F.R.
§ 800.30.
Sec. 14. NRS 637B.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.050 “Practice of audiology” means the application of
principles, methods and procedures relating to hearing and balance,
hearing disorders and related speech and language disorders and
includes, without limitation:
1. The conservation of auditory system functions;
2. Screening, identifying, assessing and interpreting,
preventing and rehabilitating auditory and balance system disorders;
3. The selection, fitting, programming , [and] dispensing and
ordering the use of hearing aids, the programming of [cochlear
implants] implantable hearing devices and other technology which
assists persons with hearing loss and training persons to use such
technology;
4. Providing vestibular and auditory rehabilitation, cerumen
management and associated counseling services;
5. Conducting research on hearing and hearing disorders for
the purpose of modifying disorders in communication involving
speech, language and hearing; and
6. Providing referral services for medical diagnosis and
treatment . [; and
7. At the request of a physician, participating in the diagnosis
of a person.]
Sec. 15. NRS 637B.055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.055 “Practice of fitting and dispensing hearing aids”
means measuring human hearing and selecting, adapting,
distributing , [or] selling or ordering the use of hearing aids and
includes, without limitation:
1. Making impressions for earmolds;
2. Administering and interpreting tests of human hearing and
middle ear functions;
3. Determining whether a person who suffers from impaired
hearing would benefit from a hearing aid;
4. Selecting , [and] fitting and ordering the use of hearing
aids;
5. Providing assistance to a person after the fitting of a hearing
aid;
6. Providing services relating to the care and repair of hearing
aids;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
7. Providing supervision and in-service training concerning
measuring human hearing and selecting, adapting, distributing , [or]
selling or ordering the use of hearing aids; and
8. Providing referral services for clinical evaluation,
rehabilitation and medical treatment of hearing impairment.
Sec. 16. NRS 637B.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.060 “Practice of speech-language pathology” means the
application of principles, methods and procedures relating to the
development and effectiveness of human communication and
disorders of human communication, and includes, without
limitation:
1. The prevention, screening, consultation, assessment,
treatment, counseling, collaboration and referral services for
disorders of speech, fluency, resonance voice language, feeding,
swallowing and cognitive aspects of communication;
2. Augmentative and alternative communication techniques
and strategies;
3. Auditory training, speech reading and speech and language
intervention for persons who suffer from hearing loss;
4. The screening of persons for hearing loss and middle ear
pathology;
5. The use of rigid oral [and] endoscopy, flexible nasal
endoscopy and stroboscopy for the purpose of [vocal tract imaging
and visualization;] evaluating and treating disorders of speech,
voice, resonance and swallowing function;
6. Selecting, fitting and establishing effective use of prosthetic
or adaptive devices for communication, swallowing or other upper
respiratory and digestive functions, not including sensory devices
used by persons with hearing loss;
7. Providing services to modify or enhance communication;
8. Providing referral services for medical diagnosis and
treatment; and
9. At the request of a physician, participating in the diagnosis
of a person.
Sec. 17. NRS 637B.075 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.075 “Sponsor” means a hearing aid specialist or
[dispensing] audiologist who is responsible for the direct
supervision and in-service training of an apprentice in the practice
of fitting and dispensing hearing aids.
Sec. 18. NRS 637B.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.080 The provisions of this chapter do not apply to any
person who:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
1. Holds a current [credential] endorsement issued by the
Department of Education on or before September 30, 2026,
pursuant to [chapter 391 of] NRS 391.019 and any regulations
adopted pursuant thereto [and] , does not hold a license issued by
the Board pursuant to this chapter and engages in the practice of
audiology or speech-language pathology solely within the scope of
that [credential;] endorsement;
2. Is employed by the Federal Government and engages in the
practice of audiology or speech-language pathology within the
scope of that employment;
3. Is a student enrolled in a program or school approved by the
Board, is pursuing a degree in audiology [or speech-language
pathology] and is clearly designated to the public as a student; or
4. Holds a current license issued pursuant to chapters 630 to
637, inclusive, 640 to 641D, inclusive, or 653 of NRS,
 and who does not engage in the private practice of audiology or
speech-language pathology in this State.
Sec. 19. NRS 637B.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.100 1. The Speech-Language Pathology, Audiology
and Hearing Aid Dispensing Board, consisting of seven members
appointed by the Governor, is hereby created.
2. The Governor shall appoint:
(a) Three members who are speech-language pathologists, each
of whom must practice in a different setting, including, without
limitation, a university, public school, hospital or private practice;
(b) Two members who are audiologists ; [, at least one of whom
must be a dispensing audiologist;]
(c) One member who is a hearing aid specialist; and
(d) One member who is a representative of the general public.
This member must not be:
(1) A speech-language pathologist, a hearing aid specialist or
an audiologist; or
(2) The spouse or the parent or child, by blood, marriage or
adoption, of a speech-language pathologist, a hearing aid specialist
or an audiologist.
3. Each member of the Board who is an audiologist, a speech-
language pathologist or a hearing aid specialist must:
(a) Have practiced, taught or conducted research in his or her
profession for the 3 years immediately preceding the appointment;
and
(b) Hold a current license issued pursuant to this chapter.
4. A person who is a stockholder in a manufacturer of hearing
aids may not be selected to or serve as a member of the Board.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
5. After the initial terms, each member of the Board serves a
term of 3 years.
6. A member of the Board shall not serve for more than two
terms.
7. If a vacancy occurs during the term of a member, the
Governor shall appoint a person similarly qualified to replace that
member for the remainder of the unexpired term.
Sec. 20. NRS 637B.132 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.132 The Board shall:
1. Enforce the provisions of this chapter and any regulations
adopted pursuant thereto;
2. Prepare and maintain a record of its proceedings, including,
without limitation, any administrative proceedings;
3. Evaluate the qualifications and determine the eligibility of
an applicant for any license [or endorsement of a license] issued
pursuant to this chapter and, upon payment of the appropriate fee,
issue the appropriate license [or endorsement of a license] to a
qualified applicant;
4. Adopt regulations establishing standards of practice for
persons licensed [or endorsed] pursuant to this chapter and any other
regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;
5. Require a person licensed [or endorsed] pursuant to this
chapter to submit to the Board documentation required by the Board
to determine whether the person has acquired the skills necessary to
engage in the practice of audiology, speech-language pathology or
fitting and dispensing hearing aids;
6. Investigate any complaint received by the Board against any
person licensed [or endorsed] pursuant to this chapter;
7. Hold hearings to determine whether any provision of this
chapter or any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter has been
violated; and
8. Unless the Board determines that extenuating circumstances
exist, forward to the appropriate law enforcement agency any
substantiated information submitted to the Board concerning a
person who engages in the practice of or offers to engage in the
practice of audiology, speech-language pathology or fitting and
dispensing hearing aids without the appropriate license [or
endorsement] issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 21. NRS 637B.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.160 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 637B.195,
637B.200, 637B.201 [,] and 637B.203 , [and 637B.204,] to be
eligible for licensing by the Board, an applicant for a license to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
engage in the practice of audiology, speech-language pathology or
fitting and dispensing hearing aids must:
1. Be a natural person of good moral character;
2. Pass an examination prescribed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 637B.191 or 637B.194, as applicable;
3. Pay the fees provided for in this chapter; and
4. Submit all information required to complete an application
for a license.
Sec. 22. NRS 637B.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.175 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this
section, the Board shall charge and collect only the following fees
whose amounts must be determined by the Board, but may not
exceed:
Application fee ...................................................... [$150] $300
License fee ................................................................. [100] 200
Fee for the renewal of a license ................................. [100] 200
Reinstatement fee ...................................................... [100] 300
Examination fee ......................................................... [300] 500
Fee for converting to a different type of license ................... 50
Fee for each additional license [or endorsement] ................. 50
Fee for obtaining license information .......................... [50] 200
2. If an [applicant] active member of, or the spouse of an
active member of, the Armed Forces of the United States, a
veteran or the surviving spouse of a veteran or a family member of
a person who was killed in the line of duty while on active duty in
the Armed Forces of the United States submits an application for a
license , [by endorsement pursuant to NRS 637B.204,] the Board
shall collect not more than one-half of the fee set forth in subsection
1 for the initial issuance of the license. For the purposes of this
subsection, a person shall be deemed to have been killed in the
line of duty while on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United
States if the person:
(a) Was killed directly in the line of duty; or
(b) Died as the result of injuries sustained while in the line of
duty.
3. All fees are payable in advance and may not be refunded.
4. The Board may waive all or part of a fee set forth in
subsection 1 at a meeting of the Board or pursuant to criteria
established by regulation of the Board.
5. As used in this section:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(a) “Family member” means a widow, widower, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, child, stepchild, dependent, sibling, half
sibling or stepsibling.
(b) “Veteran” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 417.005.
Sec. 23. NRS 637B.191 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.191 1. The Board shall adopt regulations prescribing:
(a) The examinations required pursuant to NRS 637B.160 and
concerning the practice of audiology and the practice of speech-
language pathology;
(b) The period for which a license issued pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter is valid which, except as otherwise
provided in NRS 637B.200 and 637B.202, must be not less than 1
year; and
(c) The manner in which a license [or endorsement] issued
pursuant to this chapter must be renewed, which may include
requirements for continuing education.
2. The Board may adopt regulations providing for the late
renewal of a license and the reinstatement of an expired license,
except that the Board must not renew or reinstate a license more
than 3 years after the license expired.
3. The Board may, at the request of a person licensed pursuant
to this chapter, place a license on inactive status if the holder of the
license:
(a) Does not engage in, or represent that the person is authorized
to engage in, the practice of audiology, speech-language pathology
or fitting and dispensing hearing aids in this State; and
(b) Satisfies any requirements for continuing education
prescribed by the Board pursuant to this section.
Sec. 24. NRS 637B.193 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.193 An applicant for a license to engage in the practice
of fitting and dispensing hearing aids must:
1. Successfully complete a program of education or training
approved by the Board which requires, without limitation, that the
applicant:
(a) Hold an associate’s degree or bachelor’s degree in hearing
instrument sciences; [or]
(b) Hold a high school diploma or its equivalent or an
associate’s degree or bachelor’s degree in any field other than
hearing instrument sciences, and successfully complete a training
program in hearing instrument sciences as prescribed by regulation
of the Board [.] ; or
(c) Hold a current certification issued by the National Board
for Certification in Hearing Instrument Sciences.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
2. [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 637B.201, be
certified by the National Board for Certification in Hearing
Instrument Sciences.
3.] Pass the examination prescribed pursuant to
NRS 637B.194.
[4.] 3. Comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to
NRS 637B.194.
[5.] 4. Include in his or her application the complete street
address of each location from which the applicant intends to engage
in the practice of fitting and dispensing hearing aids.
Sec. 25. NRS 637B.194 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.194 The Board shall adopt regulations regarding the
practice of fitting and dispensing hearing aids, including, without
limitation:
1. The licensing of hearing aid specialists and apprentices;
2. The educational and training requirements for hearing aid
specialists and apprentices [;] , which must include, without
limitation, on-site training and work experience;
3. The examination required pursuant to NRS 637B.160,
637B.193 [, 637B.205] and 637B.238 concerning the practice of
fitting and dispensing hearing aids; and
4. A program of in-service training for apprentices.
Sec. 26. NRS 637B.197 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.197 Except for [the holder of a provisional license issued
pursuant to NRS 637B.201] a speech-language pathology
provisional licensee and in addition to the requirements set forth in
NRS 637B.196, a speech-language pathologist must hold a current
[certificate of clinical competence] Certificate of Clinical
Competence in Speech-Language Pathology issued by the
American Speech-Language-Hearing Association or its successor
organization approved by the Board.
Sec. 27. NRS 637B.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.200 1. The Board may issue a temporary license to
engage in the practice of:
(a) Audiology, speech-language pathology or fitting and
dispensing hearing aids upon application and the payment of the fee
required pursuant to NRS 637B.175 to any person who is so
licensed in [another] the District of Columbia or any state or
territory of the United States and who meets all the qualifications
for licensing in this State; and
(b) Fitting and dispensing hearing aids upon application and
payment of the fee required pursuant to NRS 637B.175 to any
person who meets all the qualifications for licensing as a hearing aid
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
specialist [or an endorsement of a license to engage in the practice
of fitting and dispensing hearing aids] other than passing the
examination concerning the practice of fitting and dispensing
hearing aids prescribed pursuant to NRS 637B.194.
2. The Board may issue a temporary license to engage in the
practice of audiology, speech-language pathology or fitting and
dispensing hearing aids upon application and payment of the fee
required pursuant to NRS 637B.175 to any spouse of a member of
the Armed Forces of the United States who:
(a) Is so licensed in [another state;] the District of Columbia or
any state or territory of the United States; and
(b) Attests that he or she meets all of the qualifications for
licensure in this State.
3. A temporary license issued pursuant to this section:
(a) Is valid for not more than 6 months;
(b) May be renewed not more than once; and
(c) May be converted to [an active] a standard license upon the
completion of all requirements for a license and payment of the fee
required by NRS 637B.175.
Sec. 28. NRS 637B.201 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.201 1. Upon application and payment of the
application fee required pursuant to NRS 637B.175, the Board may
issue a provisional license to engage in the practice of:
(a) Speech-language pathology to a person who is completing
the clinical fellowship requirements for obtaining a [certificate of
clinical competence] Certificate of Clinical Competence in Speech-
Language Pathology issued by the American Speech-Language-
Hearing Association.
(b) Fitting and dispensing hearing aids to a person who:
(1) Holds a license to engage in the practice of fitting and
dispensing hearing aids in [another state;] the District of Columbia
or any state or territory of the United States; and
(2) [Is completing the training required for certification by
the National Board for Certification in Hearing Instrument
Sciences.] Meets the requirements of paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of
subsection 1 of NRS 637B.193 but has not yet completed the on-
site training and work experience required by the regulations
adopted pursuant to NRS 637B.194.
2. A provisional license issued pursuant to this section may be:
(a) Renewed not more than twice; and
(b) Converted to [an active] a standard license upon payment of
the fee required pursuant to NRS 637B.175 for converting the
license and the [award] submission to the Board of [:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(1) A certificate of clinical competence] proof that the
holder of the provisional license:
(1) Holds a current Certificate of Clinical Competence in
Speech-Language Pathology issued by the American Speech-
Language-Hearing Association [; or] , if the provisional license
authorizes the holder to engage in the practice of speech-language
pathology.
(2) [Certification by the National Board for Certification in
Hearing Instrument Sciences.] Has successfully completed the on-
site training and work experience required by the regulations
adopted pursuant to NRS 637B.194, if the provisional license
authorizes the holder to engage in the practice of fitting and
dispensing hearing aids.
Sec. 29. NRS 637B.202 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.202 1. Upon application and payment of the
application fee required pursuant to NRS 637B.175, the Board may
issue a limited license to engage in the practice of audiology or
speech-language pathology to a person who:
(a) Holds a current license to engage in the practice of audiology
or speech-language pathology in [another state;] the District of
Columbia or any state or territory of the United States; and
(b) Engages in the practice of audiology or speech-language
pathology in this State for demonstration, instructional or
educational purposes.
2. A limited license issued pursuant to this section is valid for
not more than 15 days.
Sec. 30. NRS 637B.203 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.203 1. The Board may issue a license by endorsement
to engage in the practice of audiology or speech-language pathology
to an applicant who meets the requirements set forth in this section.
An applicant may submit to the Board an application for such a
license if the applicant holds a corresponding valid and unrestricted
license to engage in the practice of audiology or speech-language
pathology, as applicable, in the District of Columbia or any state or
territory of the United States.
2. An applicant for a license by endorsement pursuant to this
section must submit to the Board with his or her application:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the Board that the applicant:
(1) Satisfies the requirements of subsection 1;
(2) Has not been disciplined or investigated by the
corresponding regulatory authority of the District of Columbia or
any state or territory in which the applicant currently holds or has
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
held a license to engage in the practice of audiology or speech-
language pathology, as applicable; and
(3) Has not been held civilly or criminally liable for
malpractice in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of
the United States;
(b) An affidavit stating that the information contained in the
application and any accompanying material is true and correct; and
(c) Any other information required by the Board.
3. Not later than 15 business days after receiving an application
for a license by endorsement to engage in the practice of audiology
or speech-language pathology pursuant to this section, the Board
shall provide written notice to the applicant of any additional
information required by the Board to consider the application.
Unless the Board denies the application for good cause, the Board
shall approve the application and issue a license by endorsement to
engage in the practice of audiology or speech-language pathology,
as applicable, to the applicant not later than 45 days after receiving
the application.
[4. A license by endorsement to engage in the practice of
audiology or speech-language pathology may be issued at a meeting
of the Board or between its meetings by the President of the Board.
Such an action shall be deemed to be an action of the Board.]
Sec. 31. NRS 637B.236 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.236 1. All work performed by a licensed apprentice
must be directly supervised by a hearing aid specialist or
[dispensing] audiologist, and the hearing aid specialist or
[dispensing] audiologist is responsible and civilly liable for the
negligence or incompetence of the licensed apprentice under his or
her supervision.
2. Any selection of a hearing aid for a customer made by a
licensed apprentice must be approved by a hearing aid specialist or
[dispensing] audiologist.
3. Any audiogram or sales document prepared by a licensed
apprentice must be signed by the apprentice and the supervising
hearing aid specialist or [dispensing] audiologist.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Incompetence” means a lack of ability to practice safely and
skillfully as a licensed apprentice arising from:
(1) A lack of knowledge or training; or
(2) An impaired physical or mental capability, including an
alcohol or other substance use disorder.
(b) “Negligence” means a deviation from the normal standard of
professional care exercised generally by apprentices.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
Sec. 32. NRS 637B.242 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.242 1. A hearing aid specialist or [dispensing]
audiologist licensed pursuant to this chapter may sell hearing aids
by catalog, mail or the Internet if [:
(a) The hearing aid specialist or dispensing audiologist has
received:
(1) A written statement signed by:
(I) A physician or physician assistant licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, an advanced practice registered nurse
licensed pursuant to NRS 632.237, an audiologist or a hearing aid
specialist which verifies that he or she has performed an otoscopic
examination of the person to whom the hearing aid will be sold and
the results of the examination indicate that the person may benefit
from the use of a hearing aid;
(II) A physician or physician assistant licensed pursuant
to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, an audiologist or a hearing aid
specialist which verifies that he or she has performed an audiometric
examination of the person to whom the hearing aid will be sold and
the results of the examination indicate that the person may benefit
from the use of a hearing aid; and
(III) A dispensing audiologist or a hearing aid specialist
which verifies that an ear impression has been taken of the person to
whom the hearing aid will be sold; or
(2) A waiver of the medical evaluation signed by the person
to whom the hearing aid will be sold as authorized pursuant to 21
C.F.R. § 801.421(a)(2); and
(b) The] the person to whom the hearing aid will be sold has
signed a statement acknowledging that the hearing aid specialist or
[dispensing] audiologist is selling him or her the hearing aid by
catalog, mail or the Internet . [based upon the information submitted
by the person in accordance with this section.]
2. A hearing aid specialist or [dispensing] audiologist who sells
hearing aids by catalog, mail or the Internet pursuant to this section
shall maintain a record of each sale of a hearing aid made pursuant
to this section for not less than 5 years.
3. The Board may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions
of this section, including, without limitation, the information that
must be included in each record required to be maintained pursuant
to subsection 2.
Sec. 33. NRS 637B.243 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.243 A hearing aid specialist or [dispensing] audiologist,
upon request by a physician or a member of a related profession
specified by the Board, may make audiograms for the physician’s or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
member’s use in consultation with a person who suffers from
impaired hearing.
Sec. 34. NRS 637B.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.250 1. The grounds for initiating disciplinary action
pursuant to this chapter are:
(a) Unprofessional conduct.
(b) Conviction of:
(1) A violation of any federal or state law regarding the
possession, distribution or use of any controlled substance or any
dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS;
(2) A felony or gross misdemeanor relating to the practice of
audiology, speech-language pathology or fitting and dispensing
hearing aids;
(3) A violation of any of the provisions of NRS 616D.200,
616D.220, 616D.240 or 616D.300 to 616D.440, inclusive; or
(4) Any offense involving moral turpitude.
(c) Gross or repeated malpractice, which may be evidenced by
claims of malpractice settled against a practitioner.
(d) Professional incompetence.
(e) Operation of a medical facility, as defined in NRS 449.0151,
at any time during which:
(1) The license of the facility is suspended or revoked; or
(2) An act or omission occurs which results in the suspension
or revocation of the license pursuant to NRS 449.160.
 This paragraph applies to an owner or other principal responsible
for the operation of the facility.
2. As used in this section, “unprofessional conduct” includes,
without limitation:
(a) Conduct that is harmful to the public health or safety;
(b) Obtaining a license through fraud or misrepresentation of a
material fact;
(c) Suspension or revocation of a license to engage in the
practice of audiology, speech-language pathology or fitting and
dispensing hearing aids; and
(d) A violation of any provision of:
(1) Federal law concerning the practice of audiology, speech-
language pathology or fitting and dispensing hearing aids or any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, including, without limitation,
21 C.F.R. §§ [801.420] 800.30 and [801.421;] 801.422;
(2) NRS 597.264 to 597.2667, inclusive, or any regulations
adopted pursuant thereto; or
(3) This chapter or any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
Sec. 35. NRS 637B.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.290 1. [A] Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, a person shall not engage in the practice of audiology,
speech-language pathology or fitting and dispensing hearing aids in
this State without holding a valid license issued pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter.
2. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, if the
Board determines that a person has engaged in the practice of
audiology, speech-language pathology or fitting and dispensing
hearing aids in this State without holding a valid license issued
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter [,] in violation of
subsection 1, the Board may:
(a) Issue and serve on the person an order to cease and desist
until the person obtains from the Board the proper license or
otherwise demonstrates that he or she is no longer in violation of
subsection 1. An order to cease and desist must include a telephone
number with which the person may contact the Board.
(b) Issue a citation to the person. A citation issued pursuant to
this paragraph must be in writing, describe with particularity the
nature of the violation and inform the person of the provisions of
this paragraph. Each activity in which the person is engaged
constitutes a separate offense for which a separate citation may be
issued. To appeal a citation, the person must submit a written
request for a hearing to the Board not later than 30 days after the
date of issuance of the citation.
(c) Assess against the person an administrative fine of not more
than $5,000.
(d) Impose any combination of the penalties set forth in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
Sec. 36. NRS 637B.291 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.291 Unless the Board determines that extenuating
circumstances exist, the Board shall forward to the appropriate law
enforcement agency any substantiated information submitted to the
Board concerning a person who engages in the practice of or offers
to engage in the practice of audiology, speech-language pathology
or fitting and dispensing hearing aids without the appropriate license
issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter [.] in violation of
NRS 637B.290.
Sec. 37. NRS 637B.295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.295 A member or any agent of the Board may enter any
premises in this State where a person who holds a license issued
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter engages in the practice of
audiology, speech-language pathology or fitting and dispensing
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
hearing aids and inspect it to determine whether a violation of any
provision of this chapter has occurred, including, without limitation,
an inspection to determine whether any person at the premises is
engaging in the practice of audiology, speech-language pathology or
fitting and dispensing hearing aids without the appropriate license
issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter [.] in violation of
NRS 637B.290.
Sec. 38. NRS 637B.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.310 1. The Board through its Chair or Vice Chair may
maintain in any court of competent jurisdiction a suit for an
injunction against any person engaging in the practice of audiology,
speech-language pathology or fitting and dispensing hearing aids
without a license valid under this chapter [.] in violation of
NRS 637B.290.
2. Such an injunction:
(a) May be issued without proof of actual damage sustained by
any person, this provision being a preventive as well as a punitive
measure.
(b) Shall not relieve such person from criminal prosecution for
practicing without a license.
Sec. 38.3. NRS 391.162 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.162 1. Each year when determining the salary of a
person who is employed by a school district as a speech-language
pathologist, the school district shall add 5 percent to the salary that
the employee would otherwise receive in 1 year for the employee’s
classification on the schedule of salaries for the school district if:
[1.] (a) On or before September 15 of the school year, the
employee has submitted evidence satisfactory to the school district
of the employee’s:
[(a)] (1) Licensure as a speech-language pathologist by the
Speech-Language Pathology, Audiology and Hearing Aid
Dispensing Board; or
[(b)] (2) Certification as being clinically competent in speech-
language pathology by:
[(1)] (I) The American Speech-Language-Hearing
Association; or
[(2)] (II) A successor organization to the American Speech-
Language-Hearing Association that is recognized and determined to
be acceptable by the Speech-Language Pathology, Audiology and
Hearing Aid Dispensing Board; and
[2.] (b) The employee is assigned by the school district to serve
as a speech-language pathologist during the school year.
[]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
2. No increase in salary may be given pursuant to [this section]
subsection 1 during a particular school year to an employee who
submits evidence of licensure and certification after September 15
of that school year. Once an employee has submitted evidence of
such licensure and certification to the school district, the school
district shall retain the evidence in its records, as applicable, for
future school years. An increase in salary given in accordance with
[this section] subsection 1 is in addition to any other increase to
which the employee may otherwise be entitled.
3. Any person employed by a school district who is subject to
a collective bargaining agreement, including, without limitation, a
licensed speech-language pathology assistant, must be classified in
the same manner under the collective bargaining agreement as an
employee who holds a license to practice speech-language
pathology if the person holds an endorsement issued by the
Department on or before September 30, 2026, pursuant to NRS
391.019 and any regulations adopted thereto which authorizes the
person to teach pupils who have speech and language
impairments.
Sec. 38.6. The provisions of subsection 3 of NRS 391.162, as
amended by section 38.3 of this act, do not apply to any collective
bargaining agreement entered into before January 1, 2026, but apply
to any renewal of such a collective bargaining agreement.
Sec. 39. NRS 637B.042, 637B.204 and 637B.205 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 40. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 39, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)